New York, session 2025-2026, A5195.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-y 2 to read as follows: 3 § 837-y. Crime data clearinghouse. There is hereby established within 4 the division a crime data clearinghouse which shall house all crime data 5 collected by the division, the attorney general, department of 6 corrections and community supervision, commission of correction, depart- 7 ment of environmental conservation, department of mental hygiene, gover- 8 nor's office, and any other department, division, board, bureau, commis- 9 sion, office, agency, authority or public corporation of the state. 10 Each department, division, board, bureau, commission, office, agency, 11 authority or public corporation of the state shall provide any and all 12 crime data collected to the crime data clearinghouse. The division shall 13 annually analyze all data within the crime data clearinghouse and submit 14 a report to the legislature and the governor with findings, trends, and 15 any other information the commissioner deems appropriate. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08060-01-5